Utah statutes.
17-12-3.   Additional purposes for which bonds may be issued -- Joint ownership of facilities authorized.

In addition to other purposes for which bonds may be issued, bonds may be issued for the purpose of acquiring, improving or extending systems for the collection, retention and disposition of storm and flood waters, for the acquisition, improvement or extension of public libraries, including equipment, furnishings and books therefor, acquiring or improving facilities for the collection, disposal or incineration of garbage and trash, acquiring, improving, extending, furnishing and equipping auditoriums, sports arenas, stadiums, convention centers and all properties and facilities ordinarily forming part of a so-called convention complex, or any part thereof and for acquiring, improving, extending, furnishing or equipping any improvement or facility which the county is authorized by law to own. Bonds may be issued for the county's share of any such facility to be owned jointly with any municipality or taxing district in the county and such joint ownership is expressly authorized.



Enacted by Chapter 27, 1963 General Session

